Georgia, session 2025_26, HB789.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act providing a new charter for the City of Oglethorpe, approved March 11, 1975 (Ga.
L. 1975, p. 2630), as amended, is amended by adding a new section to read as follows:
"SECTION 1.04.5.
Public hearings for zoning decisions shall be held consistent with the 'Zoning Procedures
Law,' Chapter 66 of Title 36 of the O.C.G.A."
H. B. 789
- 1 -

LC 47 3456/AP
SECTION 2.
Said Act is further amended by revising Section 2.04 and Section 2.05 as follows:
"SECTION 2.04.
Mayor pro tem.
The council, at the first regular meeting after the newly elected councilmen have taken
office following each election, shall elect from its membership a mayor pro tem who shall
serve for a term of one year. In the event that no decision is reached at such first regular
meeting, the council shall elect the mayor pro tem within ten days following such meeting;
otherwise the councilmember who received the highest number of votes when he was last
elected shall become the mayor pro tem. The mayor pro tem shall perform the duties of
the mayor during the mayor's absence or inability to act, and shall fill any unexpired term
in the office of the mayor, in which case a new mayor pro tem shall be elected by majority
vote of the council. Except in the case where the mayor pro tem is filling the office of the
mayor due to the prior mayor's inability to act, the mayor pro tem shall not take any actions
on behalf of the city without the consent of the mayor.
SECTION 2.05.
Vacancy in office of mayor of councilmember.
A vacancy shall exist if the mayor or a councilman:
(1) Resigns, dies, or moves his or her residence from the city;
(2) Is absent from four consecutive regular meetings of the governing authority, except
if granted a leave of absence by the council, or has been continuously disabled for a
period of six months so as to prevent him or her from discharging the duties of his or her
office; or
H. B. 789
- 2 -

LC 47 3456/AP
(3) If he or she is adjudged an incompetent or is convicted of malfeasance or misfeasance
in office, or felony, a violation of this Act or a violation of the election laws of the State.
The mayor and council shall appoint a qualified person to fill such a vacancy for the
remainder of the unexpired term. If a tie vote by the council to fill a vacancy is unbroken
for fifteen days, the mayor or mayor pro-tem in case of a vacancy in the office of mayor,
shall appoint a qualified person to fill the vacancy. At no time shall there be more than two
members so appointed holding office, and if a vacancy occurs with two members so
appointed on the council, a special election shall be held on the eighth Tuesday following
occurrence of the vacancy, at which election a mayor or councilman, as the case may be,
shall be elected to serve the remainder of the unexpired term of the vacant office, provided
that no such election shall be held if a regular annual election will occur within six
months."
SECTION 3.
Said Act is further amended by repealing and reserving Section 3.04, relating to the Mayor's
or recorder's court.
SECTION 4.
Said Act is further amended by adding a new article to read as follows:
"ARTICLE III-A
MUNICIPAL COURT
SECTION 3A.01.
Creation; name.
There shall be a court to be known as the Municipal Court of the City of Oglethorpe.
H. B. 789
- 3 -

LC 47 3456/AP
SECTION 3A.02.
Chief judge; other judges.
(a) The municipal court shall be presided over by a chief judge and such part-time,
full-time, or stand-by judges as shall be provided by ordinance.
(b) No person shall be qualified or eligible to serve as a judge on the municipal court
unless that person shall have attained the age of 21 years and shall possess all qualifications
required by law. All judges shall be appointed by the city council and shall serve until a
successor is appointed and qualified.
(c) Compensation of the judges shall be fixed by ordinance.
(d) Judges shall serve a term and may be removed as provided by general law.
(e) Before assuming office, each judge shall take an oath, given by the mayor, that the
judge will honestly and faithfully discharge the duties of the office to the best of that
person's ability and without fear, favor, or partiality. The oath shall be entered upon the
minutes of the city council.
SECTION 3A.03.
Convening.
The municipal court shall be convened at regular intervals as provided by ordinance.
SECTION 3A.04.
Jurisdiction; powers.
(a) The municipal court shall have jurisdiction and authority to try and punish violations
of this charter, all city ordinances, and such other violations as provided by law.
H. B. 789
- 4 -

LC 47 3456/AP
(b) The municipal court shall have authority to punish those in its presence for contempt,
provided that such punishment shall not exceed ten days in jail and a fine as authorized by
law.
(c) The municipal court may fix punishment for offenses within its jurisdiction not
exceeding a fine of $1,000.00 or imprisonment for 180 days or both such fine and
imprisonment or may fix punishment by fine, imprisonment, or alternative sentencing as
now or hereafter provided by law.
(d) The municipal court shall have authority to establish a schedule of fees to defray the
cost of operation, and shall be entitled to reimbursement of the cost of meals,
transportation, and caretaking of prisoners bound over to superior courts for violations of
state law.
(e) The municipal court shall have authority to establish bail and recognizances to ensure
the presence of those charged with violations before said court, and shall have discretionary
authority to accept cash or personal or real property as surety for the appearance of persons
charged with violations. Whenever any person shall give bail for that person's appearance
and shall fail to appear at the time fixed for trial, the bond shall be forfeited by the judge
presiding at such time, and an execution issued thereon by serving the defendant and the
defendant's sureties with a rule nisi, at least two days before a hearing on the rule nisi. In
the event that cash or property is accepted in lieu of bond for security for the appearance
of a defendant at trial, and if such defendant fails to appear at the time and place fixed for
100 trial, the cash so deposited shall be on order of the judge declared forfeited to the city, or
101 the property so deposited shall have a lien against it for the value forfeited which lien shall
102 be enforceable in the same manner and to the same extent as a lien for city property taxes.
103 (f) The municipal court shall have the same authority as superior courts to compel the
104 production of evidence in the possession of any party; to enforce obedience to its orders,
105 judgments, and sentences; and to administer such oaths as are necessary.
H. B. 789
- 5 -

LC 47 3456/AP
106 (g) The municipal court may compel the presence of all parties necessary to a proper
107 disposal of each case by the issuance of summonses, subpoenas, and warrants which may
108 be served as executed by any officer as authorized by this charter or by law.
109 (h) Each judge of the municipal court shall be authorized to issue warrants for the arrest
110 of persons charged with offenses against any ordinance of the city, and each judge of the
111 municipal court shall have the same authority as a magistrate of the state to issue warrants
112 for offenses against state laws committed within the city.
113 SECTION 3A.05.
114 Rules for court.
115 With the approval of the city council, the judge shall have full power and authority to make
116 reasonable rules and regulations necessary and proper to secure the efficient and successful
117 administration of the municipal court; provided, however, that the city council may adopt
118 in part or in toto the rules and regulations applicable to municipal courts. The rules and
119 regulations made or adopted shall be filed with the city clerk and shall be available for
120 public inspection.
121 SECTION 3A.06.
122 Petitions for review.
123 The right to seek petitions for review from the decision and judgment of the municipal
124 court shall exist in all criminal cases and ordinance violation cases, and such petitions shall
125 be made to the Superior Court of Macon County under the laws of the State of Georgia
126 regulating appeals to the superior courts."
H. B. 789
- 6 -

LC 47 3456/AP
127 SECTION 5.
128 This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025.
129 SECTION 6.
130 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 789
- 7 -